Arkansas, session 2025, HB1205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-34-101(a)(1), concerning independent
inspections of modular buildings for code compliance, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) A manufacturer of modular or factory-built structures, other
than manufactured housing that is governed by the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development, certified to do business in the State of
Arkansas may contract with an independent third-party compliance assurance or
inspection agency that is listed with the International Accreditation
Service, Inc., or other International Organization for Standardization and
International Electrotechnical Commission ISO/IEC 17011-compliant
accreditation body, for the inspection of modular or factory-built buildings
destined for delivery within the state for compliance with the Arkansas Fire
Prevention Code and applicable state and municipal electrical, plumbing, and
mechanical codes.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
*JMB193*
01-30-2025 10:39:53 JMB193

As Engrossed: H1/27/25 H1/30/25 HB1205
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that existing laws unfairly and
unreasonably restrict the number of accreditation bodies that are permitted
to provide third-party certification of modular structures in this state;
that allowing other qualified and accredited organizations to provide third-
party certifications of these structures would be beneficial to the state and
decrease costs to consumers; and that this act is immediately necessary
because the economic restrictions and limited choices for manufacturers for
manufactured and modular structures directly hinder the economy of this state
by restricting competition, increasing costs, and adversely impacting
economic activity. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act
being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health,
and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Bentley
















01-30-2025 10:39:53 JMB193